Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB422.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1556. Supplemental Mathematics Program for Kindergarten through Grade Five.--(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the department shall select a mathematics program to supplement and complement school entities' existing mathematics curricula for kindergarten through grade five learners that meets the following qualifications:(1) Demonstrates experience in engaging and motivating students to learn mathematics through self-directed practice.1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) Functions as a flexible supplemental resource.(3) Is designed to:(i) Give students control over the students' learning process so that the student takes ownership.(ii) Strengthen fact-fluency, automaticity, computational thinking and other critical problem-solving skills in mathematics.(iii) Be device-agnostic in order to include usage by teachers for in-class demonstration, modeling and coaching support to assist all students in meeting grade-level mathematics in accordance with the State academic standards approved by the State Board of Education.(iv) Offer access to a family member to encourage parental involvement.(b) The department shall make the supplemental mathematics program available for both public and nonpublic schools to voluntarily provide access to students. The department may not charge a fee for the mathematics program.(c) The department shall establish criteria by which a school can measure mathematics outcomes.(d) By July 1 each year, the department shall report to the General Assembly the number of users or school entities that voluntarily accessed the mathematics program in the past school year.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Nonpublic school." The term shall mean the same as defined 20250SB0422PN0359 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under section 922.1-A(b)."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0422PN0359 - 3 - 1234